Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.320.145

Homeless students—Support.

(1) On an annual basis, each school district must strongly encourage:

(a) All school staff to annually review the video posted on the office of the superintendent of public instruction's website on how to identify signs that indicate a student may be homeless, how to provide services and support to homeless students, and why this identification and support is critical to student success to ensure that homeless students are appropriately identified and supported; and

(b) Every district-designated homeless student liaison to attend trainings provided by the state to ensure that homeless children and youth are identified and served.

(2) Each school district shall include in existing materials that are shared with students at the beginning of the school year or at enrollment, information about services and support for homeless students, including the provisions of *RCW 28A.320.147. School districts may use the brochure posted on the website of the office of the superintendent of public instruction as a resource. Schools are also strongly encouraged to use a variety of communications each year to notify students and families about services and support available to them if they experience homelessness, including but not limited to:

(a) Distributing and collecting an annual housing intake survey;

(b) Providing parent brochures directly to students and families;

(c) Announcing the information at school-wide assemblies; or

(d) Posting information on the district's website or linking to the office of the superintendent of public instruction's website.

[ 2016 c 157 s 6; 2014 c 212 s 3.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 28A.320.147 was repealed by 2017 c 275 s 2.

Finding—Intent—Short title—2016 c 157: See notes following RCW 28A.300.540.

Findings—Intent—2014 c 212: See note following RCW 28A.300.540.